Hawaii, session 2025, SB286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $747,267 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for a grant-in-aid to the department of the prosecuting attorney of the city and county of Honolulu for the career criminal prosecution unit. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of the prosecuting attorney of the city and county of Honolulu for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request